Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.190

Order terminating parent and child relationship—Findings.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, after hearings pursuant to RCW 13.34.110 or 13.34.130, the court may enter an order terminating all parental rights to a child only if the court finds that:

(a)(i) The allegations contained in the petition as provided in RCW 13.34.180(1) are established by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence; or

(ii) The provisions of RCW 13.34.180(1) (a), (b), (e), and (f) are established beyond a reasonable doubt and if so, then RCW 13.34.180(1) (c) and (d) may be waived. When an infant has been abandoned, as defined in RCW 13.34.030, and the abandonment has been proved beyond a reasonable doubt, then RCW 13.34.180(1) (c) and (d) may be waived; or

(iii) The allegation under *RCW 13.34.180(2) is established beyond a reasonable doubt. In determining whether RCW 13.34.180(1) (e) and (f) are established beyond a reasonable doubt, the court shall consider whether one or more of the aggravated circumstances listed in RCW 13.34.132 exist; or

(iv) The allegation under *RCW 13.34.180(3) is established beyond a reasonable doubt; and

(b) Such an order is in the best interests of the child.

(2) The provisions of chapter 13.38 RCW must be followed in any proceeding under this chapter for termination of the parent-child relationship of an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040.

[ 2011 c 309 s 30; 2010 c 288 s 2; 2000 c 122 s 26; 1998 c 314 s 5; 1993 c 412 s 3; 1992 c 145 s 15; 1990 c 284 s 33; 1979 c 155 s 48; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 47.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 13.34.180 was amended by 2013 c 173 s 4, changing subsections (2) and (3) to subsections (3) and (4), respectively.

Finding—Effective date—1990 c 284: See notes following RCW 74.13.250.

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.